Louisiana, session 2026, HB218.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:2113 and 3996(B)(24) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2113. Food insecurity
A.(1) The state Department of Education, in consultation with the Louisiana
Department of Health, shall include questions pertaining to food insecurity on the
residency questionnaire administered for purposes of the federal McKinney-Vento
Homeless Children and Youth Assistance Act.
(2) Each public school shall annually distribute the questionnaire to each
student in grades kindergarten through twelve upon enrollment, change of address,
and reasonable suspicion of food insecurity by school personnel or school-based
health clinics.
B.(1) If the questionnaire responses indicate that a student is at risk for food
insecurity, the school shall provide the parents or legal guardian information on
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 218 ENROLLED
federal, state, community, and school resources and services that may be available,
including but not limited to public assistance applications, social services,
community food banks and food pantries, and school meal programs and food
pantries. For any emancipated minor or student who has reached the age of majority,
the school shall provide the information directly to the student.
(2) The information on federal, state, and community resources shall be
compiled by the Louisiana Department of Health, which shall provide the
information to each school at no cost to the school or its school board.
C. Responses to the questionnaire shall remain confidential except for
disclosure to a student's parent or legal guardian or to the student if he has reached
the age of majority or is an emancipated minor and to authorized school personnel
responsible for the provision of information as provided in Subsection B of this
Section.
D. No school employee shall use questionnaire responses to make any
decision relating to student instruction, academic opportunities, or discipline.
E. No school board or employee thereof shall be liable for damages in a civil
action for injury, death, or loss to person or property that allegedly arises from an act
or omission associated with the provisions of this Section unless the act or omission
constitutes willful or wanton misconduct.
* * *
§3996. Charter schools; exemptions; requirements
* * *
B. Notwithstanding any state law, rule, or regulation to the contrary and
except as may be otherwise specifically provided for in an approved charter, a
charter school established and operated in accordance with the provisions of this
Chapter and its approved charter and the school's officers and employees shall be
exempt from all statutory mandates or other statutory requirements that are
applicable to public schools and to public school officers and employees except for
the following laws otherwise applicable to public schools with the same grades:
* * *
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 218 ENROLLED
(24) Food insecurity questions on residency questionnaire, R.S. 17:2113.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.